Mississippi, session 2026, SB2625.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  There is hereby created the Mississippi Chief Information Officer (CIO), whom the Governor shall appoint, with the advice and consent of the Senate and in accordance with standards established by the State Personnel Board.  The CIO shall serve at the will and pleasure of the Governor in his or her cabinet.  The salary of the Chief Information Officer shall be set by the Governor, subject to the approval of the State Personnel Board, and shall be provided for out of any funds made available for such purpose by the Legislature, the federal government or other gifts or grants.  The CIO shall be responsible to the Governor for duties, which include serving as the chief policy advisor to the Governor on statewide information technology and cyber security issues, and assisting the Executive Director of the Department of Information Technology Services with his or her assigned duties and advising on the enforcement responsibilities provided in Section 25-53-21. (2)  In carrying out his or her duties under this act, the Chief Information Officer, shall: (a)  Be responsible for assisting in the protection of the state's information assets and citizens' data; (b)  Advise the Department of Information Technology Services on matters of information security and cyber security strategies and the implementation of statewide modernization of digital services; (c)  Promote the implementation of innovative solutions, like AI, while ensuring data security and efficient information technology operations; (d)  report annually to the Governor, and the report shall: (i)  Summarize the state's current and projected use of information technology and cyber security; (ii)  Outline the executive branch's strategic plan to modernize information technology and cyber security utilization statewide; (iii)  Provide a brief description of each state agency's information technology plan and cyber security plan; and (vi)  Include the expenditure of the funds provided for electronic technology, cyber security programs, equipment and hardware; and (e)  Take such other action as he or she deems necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this act. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026, and shall stand repealed on June 30, 2026.